Connecticut, session 2026, SB00279.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 14-49b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) For each new registration or renewal of registration of any motor
vehicle with the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles pursuant to this
chapter, the person registering such vehicle shall pay to the
commissioner a fee of twenty-four dollars for registration for a triennial
period or sixteen dollars for registration for a biennial period for the
following registration types: Passenger, motorcycle, motor home,
combination or antique; [. Any] except that (1) any person who is sixty-
five years or older and who obtains a one-year registration renewal
under section 14-49 for such registration type shall pay eight dollars for
the annual registration period, and (2) any person who is a veteran, as
defined in section 27-103, and who presents documentation, satisfactory
LCO 1152 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 279
to the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative,
indicating such person's status as a veteran shall be exempt from
payment of the fee. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to
any motor vehicle that is not self-propelled or that is exempted from
payment of a registration fee. This fee shall be identified as the "Passport
to the Parks Fee" on any registration form provided by the
commissioner. Payments collected pursuant to the provisions of this
subsection shall be deposited in the Passport to the Parks account
established pursuant to section 23-15h. The fee required by this
subsection is in addition to any other fees prescribed by any other
provision of this title for the registration of a motor vehicle. No part of
the "Passport to the Parks Fee" shall be subject to a refund under
subsection (z) of section 14-49.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 14-49b(b)
VA Joint Favorable C/R ENV
LCO 1152 2 of 2